Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-9005
Risk management framework.

An insurer
shall maintain a risk management framework to assist the insurer with identifying,
assessing, monitoring, managing, and reporting on its material and relevant
risks. This requirement is satisfied if the insurance group of which the insurer
is a member maintains a risk management framework applicable to the operations
of the insurer.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 5.
January 1, 2015